New Jersey, session 222, A989.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2024, c.22, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amounts for the purposes specified: 74 DEPARTMENT OF STATE 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 36 Higher Educational Services 2410 Rutgers, The State University  New Brunswick GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2410  Institutional Support........................................... $32,589,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Rutgers, The State University  New Brunswick $32,589,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82   Outcomes-Based Allocation............... ($32,589,000) 2416 Rutgers, The State University  Camden GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2416  Institutional Support............................................. $6,201,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Rutgers, The State University  Camden........ $6,201,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82   Outcomes-Based Allocation................. ($6,201,000) 2417 Rutgers, The State University  Newark GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2417  Institutional Support........................................... $11,824,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Rutgers, The State University  Newark....... $11,824,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82   Outcomes-Based Allocation............... ($11,824,000) 2430 New Jersey Institute of Technology GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2430  Institutional Support........................................... $10,238,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, New Jersey Institute of Technology.............. $10,238,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82   Outcomes-Based Allocation............... ($10,238,000) 2440 Thomas Edison State University GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2440  Institutional Support............................................. $5,335,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Thomas Edison State University...................... $5,335,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82   Outcomes-Based Allocation................. ($5,335,000) 2445 Rowan University GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2445  Institutional Support........................................... $13,987,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Rowan University........................................... $13,987,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82   Outcomes-Based Allocation............... ($13,987,000) 2450 New Jersey City University GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2450  Institutional Support............................................. $7,210,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, New Jersey City University.............................. $7,210,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82   Outcomes-Based Allocation................. ($7,210,000) 2455 Kean University GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2455  Institutional Support........................................... $12,978,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Kean University.............................................. $12,978,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82   Outcomes-Based Allocation............... ($12,978,000) 2460 William Paterson University of New Jersey GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2460  Institutional Support............................................. $9,229,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, William Paterson University of New Jersey... $9,229,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82   Outcomes-Based Allocation................. ($9,229,000) 2465 Montclair State University GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2465  Institutional Support........................................... $19,323,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Montclair State University............................. $19,323,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82   Outcomes-Based Allocation............... ($17,737,000) 82   Bloomfield College of Montclair State University Outcomes-Based Allocation...................................       ............................................................. ($1,586,000) 2470 The College of New Jersey GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2470  Institutional Support............................................. $3,893,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, The College of New Jersey............................... $3,893,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82   Outcomes-Based Allocation................. ($3,893,000) 2475 Ramapo College of New Jersey GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2475  Institutional Support............................................. $3,605,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Ramapo College of New Jersey....................... $3,605,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82   Outcomes-Based Allocation................. ($3,605,000) 2480 Stockton University GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2480  Institutional Support............................................. $7,787,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Stockton University.......................................... $7,787,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82   Outcomes-Based Allocation................. ($7,787,000) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.